Nevada, session 83, AB402.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.473 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.473 1. As used in this section, “traffic violation” means
conviction of a moving traffic violation in any municipal court,
justice court or district court in this State or a finding by any
municipal court or justice court in this State that a person has
committed a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive. The term includes a finding by a juvenile court
that a child has violated a traffic law or ordinance other than one
governing standing or parking. The term does not include [a] :
(a) A conviction or a finding by a juvenile court of a violation of
the speed limit posted by a public authority under the circumstances
described in subsection 1 of NRS 484B.617 [.] ; or
(b) A civil infraction citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for a violation described in section 2.2 of this act.
2. The Department shall establish a uniform system of demerit
points for various traffic violations occurring within this State
affecting the driving privilege of any person who holds a driver’s
license issued by the Department and persons deemed to have future
driving privileges pursuant to NRS 483.447. The system must be
based on the accumulation of demerits during a period of 12
months.
3. The system must be uniform in its operation, and the
Department shall set up a schedule of demerits for each traffic
violation, depending upon the gravity of the violation, on a scale of
one demerit point for a minor violation of any traffic law to eight
demerit points for an extremely serious violation of the law
governing traffic violations. If a conviction of two or more traffic
violations committed on a single occasion is obtained, points must
be assessed for one offense or civil infraction, and if the point values
differ, points must be assessed for the offense or civil infraction
having the greater point value. Details of the violation must be
submitted to the Department by the court where the conviction or
finding is obtained. The Department may provide for a graduated
system of demerits within each category of violations according to
the extent to which the traffic law was violated.
Sec. 2. Chapter 484A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2.1 to 2.8, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 2.1. As used in sections 2.1 to 2.8, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, “automated traffic
enforcement system” means a manned or unmanned stationary
electronic or digital system which creates a photograph or other
-
*AB402_R2*

– 4 –
recorded image of a vehicle and vehicle license plate which is used
as evidence of a violation of a traffic law by the driver of the
vehicle. Such a photograph or other recorded image must not
reveal the face of the driver or any other passenger in the vehicle.
Sec. 2.2. 1. The Department of Transportation, a local
authority and a regional transportation commission as defined in
NRS 482.1825 may, except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
authorize the installation and use of an automated traffic
enforcement system to enforce any rate of speed which is 10 miles
per hour or more over the posted speed limit:
(a) In an area designated as a temporary traffic control zone
in which construction, maintenance or repair of a highway is
conducted; and
(b) At a time when the workers who are performing the
construction, maintenance or repair of the highway are present.
2. An automated traffic enforcement system must be
accompanied by warning signs installed at the entry point of the
temporary traffic control zone. The Department shall adopt
regulations setting forth standards for such warning signs,
including, without limitation:
(a) A statement that an automated traffic enforcement system
is in use;
(b) A statement of the speed limit; and
(c) A display which alerts drivers of their current speed.
3. The Department, a local authority or a regional
transportation commission as defined in NRS 482.1825 shall
solicit bids for a contract for the installation and use of an
automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to the provisions
of chapter 332 or 333 of NRS. The contract must require the
number of citations issued during the use of the automated traffic
enforcement system in a temporary traffic control zone to be
tracked and reported to the Department, local authority or
regional transportation commission, as applicable.
4. Before commencing any enforcement, including the
issuance of a civil infraction citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035
for a violation described in this section, the Department, a local
authority or a regional transportation commission as defined in
NRS 482.1825 that installs an automated traffic enforcement
system shall establish and carry out a public information
campaign to:
(a) Raise public awareness of the proposed use of an
automated traffic enforcement system not less than 30 days before
commencing any enforcement; and
(b) Inform the public of the date upon which enforcement will
begin.
-
*AB402_R2*

– 5 –
Sec. 2.3. 1. Before a civil infraction citation is issued
pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation described in section
2.2 of this act, the evidence of the violation from the automated
traffic enforcement system must be reviewed for accuracy by a
peace officer of a traffic enforcement agency with jurisdiction over
the location of the automated traffic enforcement system.
2. If after reviewing the evidence described in subsection 1,
the peace officer determines that a violation described in section
2.2 of this act occurred, the peace officer shall cause a civil
infraction citation to be issued pursuant to NRS 484A.7035. The
citation must be sent by the traffic enforcement agency described
in subsection 1 or its designee by first class mail to the address
listed with the Department of Motor Vehicles for the registered
owner of the vehicle identified by the automated traffic
enforcement system.
3. A manual or automated record prepared by a traffic
enforcement agency described in subsection 1 or its designee in
the ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of
mailing and service, and is admissible in any hearing as to the
facts contained in the civil infraction citation.
4. In addition to the information required pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 484A.7035, a civil infraction citation issued
pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation described in section
2.2 of this act must include:
(a) The date and time of the violation;
(b) An image taken by the automated traffic enforcement
system showing the vehicle and vehicle license plate involved in
the violation or the address of the Internet website on which such
an image may be viewed; and
(c) A statement summarizing the provisions of subsection 5.
5. The registered owner of a vehicle is presumed to be the
driver of the vehicle at the time of a violation described in section
2.2 of this act was detected by an automated traffic enforcement
system. Such an inference may be rebutted if the registered owner
of the vehicle presents as evidence at a hearing held pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704, an affidavit stating:
(a) The name and address of the person having care, custody
and control of the vehicle at the time of the violation; or
(b) That the vehicle was, at the time of the violation, stolen.
Such an affidavit must be accompanied by evidence that supports
the affidavit, including, without limitation, a police report or an
insurance report.
Sec. 2.4. 1. Any photograph, recorded image or data
created by an automated traffic enforcement system:
-
*AB402_R2*

– 6 –
(a) Must only be stored and disseminated by the traffic
enforcement agency that issued the civil infraction citation
pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation described in section
2.2 of this act; and
(b) May not be sold, transferred or otherwise transmitted by
any other entity or organization except pursuant to a court order.
2. Any entity that manufactures, maintains, produces or
provides an automated traffic enforcement system or related
services for sale or lease to this State or any political subdivision
of this State shall not contract to receive payment on the basis of
the number of civil infraction citations issued pursuant to NRS
484A.7035 for a violation described in section 2.2 of this act.
Sec. 2.5. The provisions of sections 2.1 to 2.8, inclusive, of
this act do not prohibit a peace officer from issuing a citation for a
violation of any law of this State at the place where an automated
traffic enforcement system is installed and in use if the peace
officer witnesses a violation. A person who is issued a citation by a
peace officer pursuant to this section must not be issued a civil
infraction citation based on evidence from the automated traffic
enforcement system for the same violation for which the peace
officer issued the person the citation.
Sec. 2.6. 1. A violation described in section 2.2 of this act
for which a civil infraction citation is issued pursuant to
NRS 484A.7035:
(a) Is not a moving traffic violation under NRS 483.473; and
(b) Is punishable by a civil penalty pursuant to NRS
484A.7043, not to exceed $200.
2. Any money collected as a civil penalty pursuant to
subsection 1 must be accounted for separately in the county or city
treasury or State Highway Fund, as applicable, must be credited to
the Department of Transportation, local authority or regional
transportation commission as defined in NRS 482.1825, as
applicable, and the traffic enforcement agency with jurisdiction
over the location of the automated traffic enforcement system and
must be used to defray the cost of installing and operating the
automated traffic enforcement system, including, without
limitation, the costs of administering the provisions of sections 2.1
to 2.8, inclusive, of this act. Any remaining funds may be
apportioned by the board of county highway commissioners to the
road funds of the county, as applicable, to be expended as
described in NRS 403.470.
Sec. 2.7. 1. Each local authority and regional
transportation commission as defined in NRS 482.1825 that
authorizes the installation and use of an automated traffic
enforcement system pursuant to sections 2.1 to 2.8, inclusive, of
-
*AB402_R2*

– 7 –
this act, shall prepare and file a report annually with the
Department of Transportation that includes, without limitation,
the following information relating to the immediately preceding
year:
(a) The number of speeding infractions in temporary traffic
control zones;
(b) The changes in the frequency of citations in temporary
traffic control zones;
(c) The frequency of repeat violations in temporary traffic
control zones; and
(d) The number of citations issued during the use of an
automated traffic enforcement system in each temporary traffic
control zone.
2. If the Department authorizes the installation and use of an
automated traffic enforcement system pursuant to sections 2.1 to
2.8, inclusive, of this act, the Department shall prepare a report
annually that includes, without limitation, the following
information relating to the previous year:
(a) The number of speeding infractions in temporary traffic
control zones;
(b) The changes in the frequency of citations in temporary
traffic control zones;
(c) The frequency of repeat violations in temporary traffic
control zones; and
(d) The number of citations issued during the use of an
automated traffic enforcement system in each temporary traffic
control zone.
3. On or before June 30 of each year, the Department shall
compile any reports prepared pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 and
submit the compilation to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Growth and Infrastructure.
Sec. 2.8. An employer may not consider a civil infraction
citation issued pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation
described in section 2.2 of this act for the purpose of progressive
discipline against an employee.
Sec. 3. NRS 484A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.600 [A] Except as otherwise provided in sections 2.1 to
2.7, inclusive, of this act, a governmental entity and any agent
thereof shall not use photographic, video or digital equipment for
gathering evidence to be used for the issuance of a traffic citation or
civil infraction citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a violation
of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS unless the equipment
is a portable camera or event recording device worn or held by a
peace officer, the equipment is otherwise installed temporarily or
-
*AB402_R2*

– 8 –
permanently within a vehicle or facility of a law enforcement
agency or the equipment is privately owned by a nongovernmental
entity.
Sec. 4. NRS 484A.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.640 1. Except for a citation issued pursuant to NRS
484A.700 [,] or 484A.7035 for a violation described in section 2.2
of this act, whenever a police officer makes an arrest or issues a
citation to a person for any violation of chapters 484A to 484E,
inclusive, of NRS, the police officer shall record the name as given
by that person, the number of the person’s driver’s license and a
brief description of the person’s physical appearance. This
information must be maintained in a record for offenses kept at the
traffic enforcement agency which employs that officer.
2. Whenever a police officer stops a driver of a motor vehicle
for any violation of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS and
requests information from a traffic enforcement agency concerning
that person’s record of prior offenses, the police officer shall
compare not only the driver’s name but also the number of his or her
driver’s license and physical description with any information
obtained from the agency as a result of the request. If the
information received from the agency indicates that the driver’s
name is on an outstanding warrant for a prior offense, the officer
shall not arrest the driver for that prior offense unless the additional
information used for comparison also connects the driver with that
prior offense.
Sec. 5. NRS 484A.704 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.704 1. Any person who receives a civil infraction
citation pursuant to :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), NRS
484A.7035 or 484A.7049 shall respond to the citation as provided in
this section not later than 90 calendar days after the date on which
the citation is issued [.] ; or
(b) NRS 484A.7035 for a violation described in section 2.2 of
this act shall respond to the citation as provided in this section not
later than 120 days after the date on which the citation is issued.
2. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation does not
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond to the
citation by indicating that the person does not contest the
determination and submitting full payment of the monetary penalty,
the administrative assessment and any fees to the court specified in
the citation, or its traffic violations bureau, in person, by mail or
through the Internet or other electronic means.
3. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation wishes to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
-
*AB402_R2*

– 9 –
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond by
requesting in person, by mail or through the Internet or other
electronic means a hearing for that purpose. The court shall notify
the person in writing of the time, place and date of the hearing,
but the date of the hearing must not be earlier than 9 calendar days
after the court provides notice of the hearing.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, not less
than 30 days before the deadline for a person to respond to a civil
infraction citation, the court must send to the address or electronic
mail address of the person, as indicated on the civil infraction
citation issued to the person, a reminder that the person must
respond to the civil infraction citation within 90 or 120 calendar
days , as applicable under subsection 1, after the date on which the
civil infraction citation is issued. If the person agreed to receive
communications relating to the civil infraction by text message, the
court may send such a notice to the telephone number of the person
as indicated on the civil infraction citation. If the person does not
respond to the civil infraction citation in the manner specified by
subsection 2 or 3 within 90 or 120 calendar days , as applicable
under subsection 1, after the date on which the civil infraction
citation is issued, the court must enter an order pursuant to NRS
484A.7043 finding that the person committed the civil infraction
and assessing the monetary penalty and administrative assessments
prescribed for the civil infraction. A person who has been issued a
civil infraction citation and who fails to respond to the civil
infraction citation as required by this section may not appeal an
order entered pursuant to this section.
5. If any person issued a civil infraction citation fails to appear
at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3, the court must enter
an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the person
committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary penalty
and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil infraction. A
person who has been issued a civil infraction citation and who fails
to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3 may not
appeal an order entered pursuant to this subsection.
6. In addition to any other penalty imposed, any person who is
found by the court to have committed a civil infraction pursuant to
subsection 5 shall pay the witness fees, per diem allowances, travel
expenses and other reimbursement in accordance with NRS 50.225.
7. If a court has established a system pursuant to NRS
484A.615, any person issued a civil infraction citation may, if
authorized by the court, use the system to perform any applicable
actions pursuant to this section.
-
*AB402_R2*

– 10 –
Sec. 6. NRS 484A.7041 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7041 1. If, pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704,
a person receiving a civil infraction citation requests a hearing to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the hearing must be conducted in
accordance with this section.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, before a
hearing to contest the determination that a person has committed a
civil infraction, the court shall require the person to post a bond
equal to the amount of the full payment of the monetary penalty, the
administrative assessment and any fees specified in the civil
infraction citation. Any bond required to be posted for a civil
infraction citation issued pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 for a
violation described in section 2.2 of this act must not exceed $100.
In lieu of posting such a bond, the person may instead deposit cash
with the court in the amount of the bond required pursuant to this
subsection. Any bond posted or cash deposited with the court
pursuant to this subsection must be forfeited upon the court’s
finding that the person committed the civil infraction. Any person
whom the court determines is unable to pay the costs of defending
the action or is a client of a program for legal aid in accordance with
NRS 12.015 must not be required to post a bond or deposit cash
with the court in accordance with this subsection.
3. The person who requested the hearing may, at his or her
expense, be represented by counsel, and a city attorney or district
attorney, in his or her discretion and as applicable, may represent the
plaintiff.
4. A hearing conducted pursuant to this section must be
conducted by the court without a jury. In lieu of the personal
appearance at the hearing by the peace officer who issued the civil
infraction citation, the court may consider the information contained
in the civil infraction citation and any other written statement
submitted under oath by the peace officer. If the court has
established a system pursuant to NRS 484A.615, the peace officer
may, if authorized by the court, use the system to submit such a
statement. The person named in the civil infraction citation may
subpoena witnesses, including, without limitation, the peace officer
who issued the citation, and has the right to present evidence and
examine witnesses present in court.
5. After consideration of the evidence and argument, the court
shall determine whether a civil infraction was committed by the
person named in the civil infraction citation. The court must find by
a preponderance of the evidence that the person named in the civil
infraction citation committed a civil infraction. If it has not been
established by a preponderance of the evidence that the infraction
-
*AB402_R2*

– 11 –
was committed by the person named in the citation, the court must
enter an order dismissing the civil infraction citation in the court’s
records. If it has been established by a preponderance of the
evidence that the infraction was committed, the court must enter in
the court’s records an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043.
6. An appeal from the court’s determination or order may be
taken in the same manner as any other civil appeal from a municipal
court or justice court, as applicable, except that:
(a) The notice of appeal must be filed not later than 7 calendar
days after the court enters in the court’s records an order pursuant to
NRS 484A.7043;
(b) If the appellant is the person charged with the civil
infraction, any bond required to be given by the appellant in order to
secure a stay of execution of the order of the court during the
pendency of the appeal must equal the amount of the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments which the court has ordered
the appellant to pay pursuant to NRS 484A.7043. Any bond must be
forfeited if the order of the court is affirmed on appeal; and
(c) If a prosecuting attorney does not represent the plaintiff
during the proceedings in the justice court or municipal court, the
appellate court shall review the record and any arguments presented
by the person charged with the civil infraction and render a decision.
Sec. 7. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and expires
by limitation on June 30, 2029.
H
-
*AB402_R2*